Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202443-251.02
Referral to clinically credentialed community-based provider.

A peace officer, upon making contact with a child who is in need of assistance, may refer the child and child's parent or parents or guardian to a clinically credentialed community-based provider for immediate crisis intervention, de-escalation, and respite care services.

Laws 2015, LB482, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB670, § 4.